test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_VLONGVW_NoExtra_ikwe_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px1ikwe+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: niikweishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1ikwe+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: niikweishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2ikwe+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: giikweishinaanibanan
     +Px2ikwe+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: giikweishinaanibanag
     +Px2ikwe+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: giikweishinaanibaning
     +Px2ikwe+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: giikweishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2ikwe+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: giikweishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2ikwe+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: giikweishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2ikwe+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: giikweishiwaaibanan
     +Px2ikwe+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: giikweishiwaaibanag
     +Px2ikwe+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: giikweishiwaaibaning
     +Px2ikwe+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: giikweishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2ikwe+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: giikweishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2ikwe+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: giikweishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2ikwe+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: giikweishiniibanan
     +Px2ikwe+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: giikweishiniibanag
     +Px2ikwe+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: giikweishiniibaning
     +Px2ikwe+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: giikweishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2ikwe+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: giikweishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2ikwe+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: giikweishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3ikwe+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: oikweishinaanibanan
     +Px3ikwe+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: oikweishinaanibanag
     +Px3ikwe+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: oikweishinaanibaning
     +Px3ikwe+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: oikweishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3ikwe+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: oikweishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3ikwe+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: oikweishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3ikwe+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: oikweishiwaaibanan
     +Px3ikwe+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: oikweishiwaaibanag
     +Px3ikwe+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: oikweishiwaaibaning
     +Px3ikwe+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: oikweishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3ikwe+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: oikweishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3ikwe+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: oikweishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3ikwe+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: oikweishiniibanan
     +Px3ikwe+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: oikweishiniibanag
     +Px3ikwe+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: oikweishiniibaning
     +Px3ikwe+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: oikweishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3ikwe+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: oikweishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3ikwe+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: oikweishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: ikweensimishinaaniban
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: ikweensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: ikweensimishiwaaiban
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: ikweensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: ikweensimishiniiban
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: ikweensimishini***idig, idog***
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: ikweenhimishinaaniban
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: ikweenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: ikweenhimishiwaaiban
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: ikweenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: ikweenhimishiniiban
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: ikweenhimishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: ikweensimishinaanan
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: ikweensimishinaanag
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: ikweensimishinaaning
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: ikweensimishiwaaan
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: ikweensimishiwaaag
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: ikweensimishiwaaing
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: ikweensimishinian
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: ikweensimishiniag
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: ikweensimishiniing
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: ikweenhimishinaanan
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: ikweenhimishinaanag
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: ikweenhimishinaaning
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: ikweenhimishiwaaan
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: ikweenhimishiwaaag
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: ikweenhimishiwaaing
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: ikweenhimishinian
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: ikweenhimishiniag
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: ikweenhimishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: ikweensimishibanan
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: ikweensimishibanag
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: ikweensimishibaning
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: ikweensimish***idig, idog***an
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: ikweensimish***idig, idog***ag
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: ikweensimish***idig, idog***ing
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: ikweenhimishibanan
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: ikweenhimishibanag
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: ikweenhimishibaning
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: ikweenhimish***idig, idog***an
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: ikweenhimish***idig, idog***ag
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: ikweenhimish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ikweensiminaanibanan
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ikweensiminaanibanag
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ikweensiminaanibaning
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ikweensiminaan***idig, idog***an
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ikweensiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ikweensiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ikweensimiwaaibanan
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ikweensimiwaaibanag
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ikweensimiwaaibaning
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ikweensimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ikweensimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ikweensimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ikweensiminiibanan
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ikweensiminiibanag
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ikweensiminiibaning
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ikweensimini***idig, idog***an
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ikweensimini***idig, idog***ag
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ikweensimini***idig, idog***ing
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ikweenhiminaanibanan
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ikweenhiminaanibanag
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ikweenhiminaanibaning
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ikweenhiminaan***idig, idog***an
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ikweenhiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ikweenhiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     ikwe+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ikweenhimiwaaibanan
     ikwe+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ikweenhimiwaaibanag
     ikwe+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ikweenhimiwaaibaning
     ikwe+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ikweenhimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     ikwe+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ikweenhimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     ikwe+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ikweenhimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     ikwe+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ikweenhiminiibanan
     ikwe+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ikweenhiminiibanag
     ikwe+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ikweenhiminiibaning
     ikwe+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ikweenhimini***idig, idog***an
     ikwe+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ikweenhimini***idig, idog***ag
     ikwe+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ikweenhimini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 6, 7
     ikwe+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ikweensishinaanibanan
     ikwe+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ikweensishinaanibanag
     ikwe+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ikweensishinaanibaning
     ikwe+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ikweensishinaan***idig, idog***an
     ikwe+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ikweensishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     ikwe+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ikweensishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     ikwe+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ikweensishiwaaibanan
     ikwe+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ikweensishiwaaibanag
     ikwe+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ikweensishiwaaibaning
     ikwe+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ikweensishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     ikwe+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ikweensishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     ikwe+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ikweensishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     ikwe+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ikweensishiniibanan
     ikwe+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ikweensishiniibanag
     ikwe+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ikweensishiniibaning
     ikwe+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ikweensishini***idig, idog***an
     ikwe+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ikweensishini***idig, idog***ag
     ikwe+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ikweensishini***idig, idog***ing
     ikwe+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ikweenhishinaanibanan
     ikwe+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ikweenhishinaanibanag
     ikwe+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ikweenhishinaanibaning
     ikwe+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ikweenhishinaan***idig, idog***an
     ikwe+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ikweenhishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     ikwe+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ikweenhishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     ikwe+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ikweenhishiwaaibanan
     ikwe+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ikweenhishiwaaibanag
     ikwe+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ikweenhishiwaaibaning
     ikwe+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ikweenhishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     ikwe+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ikweenhishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     ikwe+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ikweenhishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     ikwe+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ikweenhishiniibanan
     ikwe+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ikweenhishiniibanag
     ikwe+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ikweenhishiniibaning
     ikwe+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ikweenhishini***idig, idog***an
     ikwe+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ikweenhishini***idig, idog***ag
     ikwe+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ikweenhishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     ikwe+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ikweimishinaanibanan
     ikwe+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ikweimishinaanibanag
     ikwe+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ikweimishinaanibaning
     ikwe+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ikweimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     ikwe+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ikweimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     ikwe+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ikweimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     ikwe+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ikweimishiwaaibanan
     ikwe+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ikweimishiwaaibanag
     ikwe+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ikweimishiwaaibaning
     ikwe+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ikweimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     ikwe+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ikweimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     ikwe+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ikweimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     ikwe+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ikweimishiniibanan
     ikwe+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ikweimishiniibanag
     ikwe+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ikweimishiniibaning
     ikwe+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ikweimishini***idig, idog***an
     ikwe+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ikweimishini***idig, idog***ag
     ikwe+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ikweimishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: niikweensimishinaaniban
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: niikweensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: niikweensimishiwaaiban
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: niikweensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: niikweensimishiniiban
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: niikweensimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px1ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: niikweenhimishinaaniban
     +Px1ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: niikweenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: niikweenhimishiwaaiban
     +Px1ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: niikweenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px1ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: niikweenhimishiniiban
     +Px1ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: niikweenhimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: giikweensimishinaaniban
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: giikweensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: giikweensimishiwaaiban
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: giikweensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: giikweensimishiniiban
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: giikweensimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: giikweenhimishinaaniban
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: giikweenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
